lexc/verb/enhuigeszt.lexc
LEXICON Caselesz33
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


!tegy
LEXICON AddVerbtesz3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casetesz3;

LEXICON Casetesz3
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§igeaa§l    #;
!+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^           #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§igea§d         #;
!+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§igeaa§k            #;
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§igea§l§igea§k          #;

!vigy
LEXICON AddVerbvisz3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casevisz3;

LEXICON Casevisz3
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§igeaa§l    #;
!+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^           #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§igea§d         #;
!+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§igeaa§k            #;
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§igea§l§igea§k          #;


!hi
LEXICON AddVerbhisz7
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Imperhisz7;

LEXICON Imperhisz7                      !hitet
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^nn§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^nn§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^nni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^nn§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^nn§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^nni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^nni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^nni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
!+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrephisz7;
                      Pot1hisz7;

LEXICON Nrephisz7                       !hitetget
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperhisz7;
                      Pothisz9;       

LEXICON NImperhisz7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pothisz7;          !hitetgettet
                      Pothisz9;

LEXICON Pothisz7                         !hitetgettethet
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfhisz7;
             Casehisz7;
LEXICON Pothisz9                         !hitetgettethet
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfhisz7;
             Casehisz7;

LEXICON Pot1hisz7
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfhisz7;
             Case1hisz7; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInfhisz7                         !hitetgettethet
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Casehisz7;

LEXICON Verb1
arrébbtesz:arrébbte AddVerbhisz7;
arrébbtesz:arrébbtegy AddVerbtesz3;
arrébbvisz:arrébbvi AddVerbhisz7;
arrébbvisz:arrébbvigy AddVerbvisz3;
jóvátesz:jóváte AddVerbhisz7;
jóvátesz:jóvátegy AddVerbtesz3;
kijjebbvisz:kijjebbvi AddVerbhisz7;
kijjebbvisz:kijjebbvigy AddVerbvisz3;
közzétesz:közzéte AddVerbhisz7;
közzétesz:közzétegy AddVerbtesz3;
közétesz:közéte AddVerbhisz7;
közétesz:közétegy AddVerbtesz3;
lejjebbtesz:lejjebbte AddVerbhisz7;
lejjebbtesz:lejjebbtegy AddVerbtesz3;
lejjebbvisz:lejjebbvi AddVerbhisz7;
lejjebbvisz:lejjebbvigy AddVerbvisz3;
mögétesz:mögéte AddVerbhisz7;
mögétesz:mögétegy AddVerbtesz3;
odébbtesz:odébbte AddVerbhisz7;
odébbtesz:odébbtegy AddVerbtesz3;
odébbvisz:odébbvi AddVerbhisz7;
odébbvisz:odébbvigy AddVerbvisz3;
szemrevesz:szemreve AddVerbhisz7;
szemrevesz:szemrevegy AddVerbtesz3;
szemügyrevesz:szemügyreve AddVerbhisz7;
szemügyrevesz:szemügyrevegy AddVerbtesz3;
számbavesz:számbave AddVerbhisz7;
számbavesz:számbavegy AddVerbtesz3;
telitesz:telite AddVerbhisz7;
telitesz:telitegy AddVerbtesz3;
tönkretesz:tönkrete AddVerbhisz7;
tönkretesz:tönkretegy AddVerbtesz3;
véghezvisz:véghezvi AddVerbhisz7;
véghezvisz:véghezvigy AddVerbvisz3;
észrevesz:észreve AddVerbhisz7;
észrevesz:észrevegy AddVerbtesz3;
